District of Columbia statutes.
22-1002

Other cruelties to animals.

Every owner, possessor, or person having the charge or custody of any animal, who cruelly drives or works the same when unfit for labor, or cruelly abandons the same, or who carries the same, or causes the same to be carried, in or upon any vehicle, or otherwise, in an unnecessarily cruel or inhuman manner, or knowingly and wilfully authorizes or permits the same to be subjected to unnecessary torture, suffering, or cruelty of any kind, shall be punished for every such offense in the manner provided in § 22-1001.

History

Aug. 23, 1871, Leg. Assem., p. 135, ch. 106, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-802.
1973 Ed., § 22-802.